Missouri, session 2026, HB2320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 537.046 and 556.037, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 537.046 and 556.037, to read as follows:
537.046. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Childhood sexual abuse", any act committed by the defendant against the
plaintiff which act occurred when the plaintiff was under the age of eighteen years and which
act would have been a violation of section 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060,
566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067, 566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.093,
566.095, 566.100, 566.101, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 568.020, or 573.200;
(2) "Injury" or "illness", either a physical injury or illness or a psychological injury or
illness. A psychological injury or illness need not be accompanied by physical injury or
illness.
2. Any action to recover damages from injury or illness caused by childhood sexual
abuse in an action brought pursuant to this section [shall be commenced within ten years of
the plaintiff attaining the age of twenty-one or within three years of the date the plaintiff
discovers, or reasonably should have discovered, that the injury or illness was caused by
childhood sexual abuse, whichever later occurs] may be commenced at any time.
3. This section shall apply to any action arising on or after August 28, [2025] 2026.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2320 2
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a nondisclosure
agreement by any party to a childhood sexual abuse action shall not be judicially enforceable
in a dispute involving childhood sexual abuse allegations or claims, and shall be void.
556.037. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 556.036 or any other
provision of law, prosecutions for unlawful sexual offenses involving a person eighteen years
of age or under may be commenced at any time.
2. For purposes of this section, "sexual offenses" include, but are not limited to, any
offense listed in chapter 566 or all offenses for which registration is required under sections
589.400 to 589.425.
✔